Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1720.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 904(a), (b) and (e) of the act of May 1, 1933 (P.L.103, No.69), known as The Second Class Township Code, are amended to read:Section 904. Completion, Filing and Publication of Annual Township Report and Financial Statement.--(a) The board of auditors shall complete their audit, settlement and adjustment before the [first day of April] last day of June of each year.(b) The board of auditors shall make a report of the affairs of the township, executed copies of which report shall be filed not later than [ninety days after the close of the fiscal year] the last day of June of each year by the secretary of the board of auditors with the township secretary, the clerk of the court 1234567891011121314151617181920 of the county or the prothonotary under local rules of court, the Department of Community Affairs and the Department of Transportation. Each copy of the report shall be signed by at least a majority of the board of auditors and duly verified by the oath of the secretary of the board of auditors. Any secretary of the board of auditors who fails to file the township report or to publish the required financial statement commits a summary offense.* * *(e) On or before the fifteenth day of [April] July of each year, the secretary of the township shall publish, once in one newspaper of general circulation in the township, concise financial information prepared or approved by the auditors and consistent with the audited financial statements, for total assets, total liabilities and total net position at year end and total revenue, expenses and changes in net position for the year just ended and a reference to a place within the township where copies of the financial statements and accompanying auditor's report may be examined. If the full financial statements and accompanying auditor's report are not published, copies shall be supplied to the publishing newspaper when the request for publication is submitted.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1720PN2120 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324